src/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON LÅGENAN	 				
lågenannuppát+A+Ord:lågenan#nuppád9 VUOSTASJ ; 
lågenannælját+A+Ord:lågenan#næljád9 VUOSTASJ ; 
lågenangudát+A+Ord:lågenan#gudád9 VUOSTASJ ; 
lågenangávtsát+A+Ord:lågenan#gávtsád9 VUOSTASJ ;
vuostasjlågåt+A+Ord:vuostasj#lågåd9 VUOSTASJ ;
lågenanguovtes+N+Coll:lågenan#guoktás VIDÁS ;    
lågenanguovtes+N+Coll:lågenan#guokt GUOVTES ;    
lågenangålmås+N+Coll:lågenan#gålmmås VIDÁS ;        
lågenannieljes+N+Coll:lågenan#nælljás VIDÁS ;       
lågenanviđás+N+Coll:lågenan#vihttas VIDÁS ;       
lågenanguđás+N+Coll:lågenan#guhttas VIDÁS ;      
lågenangietjas+N+Coll:lågenan#giehtjas VIDÁS ;       
lågenangávtses+N+Coll:lågenan#gáktsás VIDÁS ;        
lågenanavtses+N+Coll:lågenan#aktsás VIDÁS ;  		 			 
nuppátlågåt+Use/-Spell+A+Ord:nuppát#lågåd9 VUOSTASJ ;        
næljátlågåt+Use/-Spell+A+Ord:nælját#lågåd9 VUOSTASJ ;        
gudátlågåt+Use/-Spell+A+Ord:gudát#lågåd9 VUOSTASJ ;        
gávtsátlågåt+Use/-Spell+A+Ord:gávtsát#lågåt VUOSTASJ ;       
guovteslågenan+Use/-Spell+N+Coll:guoktás VIDÁSLÅGENAN ;   !old 
gålmåslågenan+Use/-Spell+N+Coll:gålmmås VIDÁSLÅGENAN ; !old
nieljeslågenan+Use/-Spell+N+Coll:nælljás VIDÁSLÅGENAN ;       !old
vidáslågenan+Use/-Spell+N+Coll:vihttas VIDÁSLÅGENAN ;   !old
guđáslågenan+Use/-Spell+N+Coll:guhttas VIDÁSLÅGENAN ;   !old 
gietjaslågenan+Use/-Spell+N+Coll:giehtjas VIDÁSLÅGENAN ;  !old
gávtseslågenan+Use/-Spell+N+Coll:gáktsás VIDÁSLÅGENAN ; !old
avtseslågenan+Use/-Spell+N+Coll:aktsás# VIDÁSLÅGENAN ; !old   
LEXICON COLLECTIVE    !Some collective numbers that do not fit in anywhere else
guoktagis+N+Coll:guoktagis TJUODAGIS ;           
gålmmågis+N+Coll:gålmmågis TJUODAGIS ;           
nielljagis+N+Coll:nielljagis TJUODAGIS ; 
nieljagis+N+Coll:nieljagis TJUODAGIS ;        
vihttagis+N+Coll:vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;     
guhttagis+N+Coll:guhttagis TJUODAGIS ;               
giehtjagis+N+Coll:giehtjagis TJUODAGIS ; 
gietjagis+N+Coll:gietjagis TJUODAGIS ;            
gáktsagis+N+Coll:gáktsagis TJUODAGIS ; 
gáktsegis+N+Coll:gáktsegis TJUODAGIS ;          
aktsegis+N+Coll:aktsegis TJUODAGIS ;         
låhkegis+N+Coll:låhkegis TJUODAGIS ;
guoktalåkvihttagis+N+Coll:guokta#låk#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;     
guoktelåkvihttagis+N+Coll:guokte#låk#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ; 
gålmmålåkvihttagis+N+Coll:gålmmå#låk#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;     
nielljelåkvihttagis+N+Coll:niellje#låk#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;       
guhttalåkvihttagis+N+Coll:guhtta#låk#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;     
giehtjalåkvihttagis+N+Coll:giehtja#låk#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;     
gáktsalåkvihttagis+N+Coll:gáktsa#låk#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;     
aktselåkvihttagis+N+Coll:aktse#låk#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ; 
guoktelågevihttagis+N+Coll:guokte#låge#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;     
gålmmålågevihttagis+N+Coll:gålmmå#låge#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;     
nielljelågevihttagis+N+Coll:niellje#låge#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;      
guhttalågevihttagis+N+Coll:guhtta#låge#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;     
giehtjalågevihttagis+N+Coll:giehtja#låge#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;     
gáktsalågevihttagis+N+Coll:gáktsa#låge#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;     
aktselågevihttagis+N+Coll:aktse#låge#vihttagis TJUODAGIS ;   
avtatjuodagis+N+Coll:avta#tjuodagis TJUODAGIS ; 
nieljetjuodagis+N+Coll:nielje#tjuodagis TJUODAGIS ;
gudátjuodagis+N+Coll:gudá#tjuodagis TJUODAGIS ;  
gávtsetjuodagis+N+Coll:gávtse#tjuodagis TJUODAGIS ; 
gallagis+N+Coll:gallagis TJUODAGIS ; 
neljuk+N+Coll:neljug9 VUOSTASJ ;  
guovtelågåk+N+Coll:guovte#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;			
nieljelågåk+N+Coll:nielje#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;			
gudálågåk+N+Coll:gudá#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;			
gávtselågåk+N+Coll:gávtse#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;			
tjuodak+N+Coll:tjuodag9 VUOSTASJ ;			 
guovtetjuodak+N+Coll:guovte#tjuodag9 VUOSTASJ ;			   
gudátjuodak+N+Coll:gudá#tjuodag9 VUOSTASJ ;			   
tjuohtevidálågåk+N+Coll:tjuohte#vidá#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;			
gålmmåtjuodevidálågåk+N+Coll:gålmmå#tjuode#vidá#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;			
guoktjuotvidálågåk+Num:guok#tjuot#vidá#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;
nielljetjuotvidálågåk+N+Coll:niellje#tjuot#vidá#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;
gålmmåtjuohtevidálågåk+N+Coll:gålmmå#tjuohte#vidá#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;		
guhttatjuodevidálågåk+N+Coll:guhtta#tjuode#vidá#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;			
vihttatjuohtevidálågåk+N+Coll:vihtta#tjuohte#vidá#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;		
giehtjatjuohtevidálågåk+N+Coll:giehtja#tjuohte#vidá#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;
gietjatjuotvidálågåk+N+Coll:gietja#tjuot#vidá#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;
aktsetjuodevidálågåk+N+Coll:aktse#tjuode#vidá#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;	
gáktsatjuohtevidálågåk+N+Coll:gáktsa#tjuohte#vidá#lågåg9 VUOSTASJ ;	
LEXICON num-imprecise
biellegoalmát+Num:bielle#goalmád9 VUOSTASJ ;              
biellevidát+Num:bielle#vidád9 VUOSTASJ ;
biellegiehttjit+Num:bielle#giehttjid9 VUOSTASJ ;              
bielleavtsát+Num:bielle#avtsád9 VUOSTASJ ;              
